Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.902

Effective date—1985 c 455.

With the exception of sections 13, 14, 15, 16, and 17 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1985.

[ 1985 c 455 s 21.]